Massachusetts, session 194th, S262.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of chapter 6D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end of subsection (a) the following
clause:-
(9) assist consumers with questions or concerns relating to electronic health information
accessibility requirements established by section 7 of chapter 118I, and record and submit
reported violations of said section to the executive office of health and human services, the
attorney general, and the Office of the National Coordinator, as defined in section 1 of chapter
118I.
of 3

SECTION 2. Section 7 of chapter 118I of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
In order to ensure the seamless and secure access, exchange, and use of electronic health
information, all providers in the commonwealth shall comply with the requirements imposed by
the 21st Century Cures Act of 2016, P.L. 114-255, including, but not limited to, interoperability,
patient access through application programming interfaces, and prohibitions on information
blocking to health information technology developers, health information exchanges, health
information networks, and health care providers. The executive office, in consultation with the
commission, shall develop a standardized written notification form for providers to give to
patients, informing patients of their rights and obligations as it pertains to their electronic health
information and accessibility per federal and state law. Said notification forms may be provided
electronically to patients and shall inform said patients on how to report violations of electronic
health information access to the office of patient protection, established under section 16 of
chapter 6D.
The executive office of health and human services shall promulgate regulations to
prohibit the collection, capture, purchase, or transfer of electronic health information by third
party application programming interfaces without the express written consent of the patient.
Said written consent may be obtained by electronic means in a conspicuous and easy to read
format. Said regulations shall prohibit third party application programming interfaces from
disclosing, redisclosing, disseminating, selling, leasing, trading, or otherwise profiting from a
patient’s electronic health information unless it is to provide direct data access to the patient with
their express written consent.
of 3

A violation of this section is punishable by a fine in accordance with section 8 of this
chapter and shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act in violation of chapter 93A.
SECTION 3. Section 8 of said chapter 118I is hereby amended by inserting after the
words “section 7” in the first sentence the following:- “; provided that violations involving
patient access to electronic health information, as reported by the commission’s office of patient
protection, shall be no less than $1,000 per day per violation”
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect immediately upon its passage.
of 3